core/server/Samples/MyProjects/GyroGears/layouts/default/ro_RO.aff
#defect de plural
SFX f Y 69
SFX f   ă     a       ă              s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   ă     a-i       ă
SFX f   ă     o       ă
SFX f   eală eli      eală           s.f.sg.dat.neart
SFX f   eală elii      eală           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ură urii      ură              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ură uri       ură             s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   că cii      că                 s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   că ci       că                 s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   ală elii      [^e]ală           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ală eli       [^e]ală           s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   dă zi dă                         s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   dă zii dă                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   e ea      ire                     s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e eo      ire
SFX f   e ea-i      ire
SFX f   e i      ire                       s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f   e ii      ire                      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   0 a      oare                   s.f.sg.art
SFX f   0 o      oare
SFX f   0 a-i      oare
SFX f   are ri      oare                s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   are rii      oare               s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   are   ării    [^oi]are       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   are   ări     [^oi]are       s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f   are   area   [^oi]are      s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   are   area-i   [^oi]are      
SFX f   are   areo   [^oi]are      
SFX f   e     ea     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ea-i     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     eo     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ii      ere            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   e     i       ere            s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f  ză   ze   ză     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ză   zei   ză     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ță   țe   ță     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ță   ței   ță     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  tă   te   tă     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  tă   tei   tă     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  nă   ne   nă     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  nă   nei   nă     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  mă   me   mă     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  mă   mei   mă     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  fă   fe   fă     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  fă   fei   fă     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  vă   ve   vă     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  vă   vei   vă     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ră   re   [^u]ră     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ră   rei   [^u]ră     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ie   ia    ie         s.f.sg.art.
SFX f  ie   ia-i    ie         
SFX f  ie   io    ie         
SFX f  ie   iei    ie         s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f  ie   ii    ie         s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   0     a   ime       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   0     a-i   ime       
SFX f   0     o   ime       
SFX f   e     i   ime       s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   e     ii   ime       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   ate   atea    ate       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   ate   atea-i    ate     
SFX f   ate   ateo    ate     
SFX f   ate   ății    ate       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   ate   ăți     ate       s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   0     a      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   0     a-i      [iu]ne       
SFX f   0     o      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ii      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   e     i       [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.neart.


SFX F Y 53
SFX F   ă     a       ă              s.f.sg.art.
SFX F   ă     a-i       ă
SFX F   ă     o       ă
SFX F   eală elii      eală           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   eală eli       eală           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   eală  elile     eală         s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   eală  elilor   eală          s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ură urii      ură              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ură uri       ură             s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ură  urile     ură            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ură  urilor   ură             s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   că cii      că                 s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   că ci       că                 s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   că cile     că                 s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   că cilor    că                 s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ală elii      [^e]ală           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ală eli       [^e]ală           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ală elile     [^e]ală           s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ală elilor    [^e]ală           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   dă zi dă                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   dă zii dă                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   dă zile dă                       s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   dă zilor dă                      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   e ea      ire                     s.f.sg.art.
SFX F   e eo      ire
SFX F   e ea-i      ire
SFX F   e i      ire                       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   e ii      ire                      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   e ile      ire                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   e ilor      ire                   s.f.pl.dat
SFX F   0 a      oare                   s.f.sg.art
SFX F   0 o      oare
SFX F   0 a-i      oare
SFX F   are ri      oare                s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   are rii      oare               s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   are rile      oare             s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   are rilor      oare            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ajă  ăji      ajă               s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ajă  ăjii      ajă              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ajă  ăjile      ajă            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ajă  ăjilor      ajă            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ă  i      ină                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ă  ii      ină                   s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ă  ile      ină                 s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ă  ilor      ină                s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ară ări      [^oe]ară          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ară ării     [^oe]ară           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ară ările    [^oe]ară           s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ară ărilor   [^oe]ară           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ară ri      [oe]ară            s.f.pll.neart.
SFX F   ară rii     [oe]ară             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ară rile    [oe]ară            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ară rilor   [oe]ară            s.f.pl.dat.
